trunk/resultats/myspell/avl.myspell.aff
SFX C Y 85
SFX C 0 -ne .
SFX C 0 -me .
SFX C 0 -nos .
SFX C 0 -te .
SFX C 0 -vos .
SFX C 0 -se .
SFX C 0 -lo .
SFX C 0 -la .
SFX C 0 -li .
SFX C 0 -los .
SFX C 0 -les .
SFX C 0 -ho .
SFX C 0 -hi .
SFX C 0 -se't .
SFX C 0 -se-us .
SFX C 0 -se'm .
SFX C 0 -te'm .
SFX C 0 -vos-em .
SFX C 0 -se'ns .
SFX C 0 -te'ns .
SFX C 0 -vos-ens .
SFX C 0 -se'l .
SFX C 0 -te'l .
SFX C 0 -vos-el .
SFX C 0 -me'l .
SFX C 0 -nos-el .
SFX C 0 -los-el .
SFX C 0 -l'hi .
SFX C 0 -se'ls .
SFX C 0 -te'ls .
SFX C 0 -vos-els .
SFX C 0 -me'ls .
SFX C 0 -nos-els .
SFX C 0 -los-els .
SFX C 0 -los-hi .
SFX C 0 -se-la .
SFX C 0 -te-la .
SFX C 0 -vos-la .
SFX C 0 -me-la .
SFX C 0 -nos-la .
SFX C 0 -los-la .
SFX C 0 -la-hi .
SFX C 0 -se-les .
SFX C 0 -te-les .
SFX C 0 -vos-les .
SFX C 0 -me-les .
SFX C 0 -nos-les .
SFX C 0 -los-les .
SFX C 0 -les-hi .
SFX C 0 -se-li .
SFX C 0 -te-li .
SFX C 0 -vos-li .
SFX C 0 -me-li .
SFX C 0 -nos-li .
SFX C 0 -s'ho .
SFX C 0 -t'ho .
SFX C 0 -vos-ho .
SFX C 0 -m'ho .
SFX C 0 -nos-ho .
SFX C 0 -los-ho .
SFX C 0 -li-ho .
SFX C 0 -se'n .
SFX C 0 -te'n .
SFX C 0 -vos-en .
SFX C 0 -me'n .
SFX C 0 -nos-en .
SFX C 0 -l'en .
SFX C 0 -los-en .
SFX C 0 -la'n .
SFX C 0 -les-en .
SFX C 0 -li'n .
SFX C 0 -s'hi .
SFX C 0 -t'hi .
SFX C 0 -vos-hi .
SFX C 0 -m'hi .
SFX C 0 -nos-hi .
SFX C 0 -l'hi .
SFX C 0 -los-hi .
SFX C 0 -la-hi .
SFX C 0 -les-hi .
SFX C 0 -n'hi .
SFX C 0 -li'l .
SFX C 0 -li'ls .
SFX C 0 -li-la .
SFX C 0 -li-les .

SFX D Y 85
SFX D 0 'n .
SFX D 0 'm .
SFX D 0 'ns .
SFX D 0 't .
SFX D 0 -us .
SFX D 0 's .
SFX D 0 'l .
SFX D 0 -la .
SFX D 0 -li .
SFX D 0 'ls .
SFX D 0 -les .
SFX D 0 -ho .
SFX D 0 -hi .
SFX D 0 -se't .
SFX D 0 -se-us .
SFX D 0 -se'm .
SFX D 0 -te'm .
SFX D 0 -us-em .
SFX D 0 -se'ns .
SFX D 0 -te'ns .
SFX D 0 -us-ens .
SFX D 0 -se'l .
SFX D 0 -te'l .
SFX D 0 -us-el .
SFX D 0 -me'l .
SFX D 0 'ns-el .
SFX D 0 'ls-el .
SFX D 0 -l'hi .
SFX D 0 -se'ls .
SFX D 0 -te'ls .
SFX D 0 -us-els .
SFX D 0 -me'ls .
SFX D 0 'ns-els .
SFX D 0 'ls-els .
SFX D 0 'ls-hi .
SFX D 0 -se-la .
SFX D 0 -te-la .
SFX D 0 -us-la .
SFX D 0 -me-la .
SFX D 0 'ns-la .
SFX D 0 'ls-la .
SFX D 0 -la-hi .
SFX D 0 -se-les .
SFX D 0 -te-les .
SFX D 0 -us-les .
SFX D 0 -me-les .
SFX D 0 'ns-les .
SFX D 0 'ls-les .
SFX D 0 -les-hi .
SFX D 0 -se-li .
SFX D 0 -te-li .
SFX D 0 -us-li .
SFX D 0 -me-li .
SFX D 0 'ns-li .
SFX D 0 -s'ho .
SFX D 0 -t'ho .
SFX D 0 -us-ho .
SFX D 0 -m'ho .
SFX D 0 'ns-ho .
SFX D 0 'ls-ho .
SFX D 0 -li-ho .
SFX D 0 -se'n .
SFX D 0 -te'n .
SFX D 0 -us-en .
SFX D 0 -me'n .
SFX D 0 'ns-en .
SFX D 0 -l'en .
SFX D 0 'ls-en .
SFX D 0 -la'n .
SFX D 0 -les-en .
SFX D 0 -li'n .
SFX D 0 -s'hi .
SFX D 0 -t'hi .
SFX D 0 -us-hi .
SFX D 0 -m'hi .
SFX D 0 'ns-hi .
SFX D 0 -l'hi .
SFX D 0 'ls-hi .
SFX D 0 -la-hi .
SFX D 0 -les-hi .
SFX D 0 -n'hi .
SFX D 0 -li'l .
SFX D 0 -li'ls .
SFX D 0 -li-la .
SFX D 0 -li-les .

SFX E Y 14
SFX E 0 s [^ans]
SFX E 0 s [^íéè]n
SFX E ín ins ín
SFX E èn ens èn
SFX E én ens én
SFX E 0 os [sx][ct]
SFX E ig jos [aeo]ig
SFX E a es [^cçgju]a
SFX E a es [^gq]ua
SFX E ua ües [gq]ua
SFX E ca ques ca
SFX E ça ces ça
SFX E ga gues ga
SFX E ja ges ja

SFX F Y 18
SFX F 0 a [^eosxç]
SFX F e a e
SFX F o a o
SFX F 0 s [^asçx]
SFX F a es a
SFX F 0 os [sx][ct]
SFX F 0 es [^aeocçgsux]
SFX F a es a
SFX F 0 s e
SFX F o es [^jgc]o
SFX F jo ges jo
SFX F go gues go
SFX F co ques co
SFX F c ques c
SFX F ç ces ç
SFX F g gues g
SFX F 0 es [^gq]u
SFX F u ües [gq]u

SFX G Y 16
SFX G è é è
SFX G 0 ns a
SFX G 0 ns e
SFX G 0 ns i
SFX G 0 ns o
SFX G 0 ns u
SFX G à ans à
SFX G è ens è
SFX G é ens é
SFX G í ins [^aeou]í
SFX G í ins [gqaeoi]uí
SFX G í ïns [^gqaeoi]uí
SFX G í ïns [aeo]í
SFX G ò ons ò
SFX G ó ons ó
SFX G ú uns ú

SFX H Y 34
SFX H è é è
SFX H 0 na [aeiou]
SFX H à ana à
SFX H è ena è
SFX H é ena é
SFX H í ina [^aeou]í
SFX H í ina [gq]uí
SFX H í ïna [^gq]uí
SFX H í ïna [aeo]í
SFX H ò ona ò
SFX H ó ona ó
SFX H ú una ú
SFX H 0 ns [aeiou]
SFX H à ans à
SFX H è ens è
SFX H é ens é
SFX H í ins [^aeou]í
SFX H í ins [gq]uí
SFX H í ïns [^gq]uí
SFX H í ïns [aeo]í
SFX H ò ons ò
SFX H ó ons ó
SFX H ú uns ú
SFX H 0 nes [aeiou]
SFX H à anes à
SFX H è enes è
SFX H é enes é
SFX H í ines [^aeou]í
SFX H í ines [gq]uí
SFX H í ïnes [^gq]uí
SFX H í ïnes [aeo]í
SFX H ò ones ò
SFX H ó ones ó
SFX H ú unes ú

SFX I Y 13
SFX I 0 os [^s]
SFX I 0 os [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX I às asos às
SFX I ès esos ès
SFX I és esos és
SFX I ís isos [^aeou]ís
SFX I ís ïsos [aeo]ís
SFX I ís isos [gq]uís
SFX I ís ïsos [^gq]uís
SFX I òs osos òs
SFX I ós osos ós
SFX I ús usos [^aeoi]ús
SFX I ús üsos [aeoi]ús

SFX J Y 28
SFX J 0 a [^s]
SFX J 0 a [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX J às asa às
SFX J ès esa ès
SFX J és esa és
SFX J ís isa ís
SFX J òs osa òs
SFX J ós osa ós
SFX J ús usa ús
SFX J 0 os [^s]
SFX J 0 os [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX J às asos às
SFX J ès esos ès
SFX J és esos és
SFX J ís isos ís
SFX J òs osos òs
SFX J ós osos ós
SFX J ús usos ús
SFX J 0 es [^sç]
SFX J ç ces ç
SFX J 0 es [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX J às ases às
SFX J ès eses ès
SFX J és eses és
SFX J ís ises ís
SFX J òs oses òs
SFX J ós oses ós
SFX J ús uses ús

SFX K Y 19
SFX K ari ària ari
SFX K aci àcia aci
SFX K adi àdia adi
SFX K ori òria ori
SFX K emi èmia emi
SFX K oli òlia oli
SFX K ogen ògena ogen
SFX K ogin ògina ogin
SFX K 0 s [aeiou]
SFX K ogen ògens ogen
SFX K ogin ògins ogin
SFX K ari àries ari
SFX K adi àdies adi
SFX K aci àcies aci
SFX K ori òries ori
SFX K emi èmies emi
SFX K oli òlies oli
SFX K ogen ògenes ogen
SFX K ogin ògines ogin

SFX L Y 17
SFX L ini ínia ini
SFX L igi ígia igi
SFX L igin ígina igin
SFX L igen ígena igen
SFX L agen àgena agen
SFX L umen úmena umen
SFX L 0 s i
SFX L igin ígins igin
SFX L igen ígens igen
SFX L agen àgens agen
SFX L umen úmens umen
SFX L ini ínies ini
SFX L igi ígies igi
SFX L igin ígines igin
SFX L igen ígenes igen
SFX L agen àgenes agen
SFX L umen úmenes umen
