trunk/resultats/myspell/avl.myspell.dic
abissini/LVY
acantopterigi/LVY
acatxoneu/C
aciculifoli/KVY
aclivelli/D
acròpet/FVY
actini/EVY
adhesió/GVY
adjudicatari/KVY
adreçar/CY
afitore/D
afix/JVY
agombolador/FVY
agostador/EVY
agró/GVY
agropecuari/KVY
aguantau/C
aiguadeix/IVY
aiodà/HVY
airejós/JVY
alçapius/IVY
alcolejà/HVY
algerí/HVY
algometria/EVY
alífer/FVY
alimente/D
allavós/JVY
al·ligació/GVY
al·lotigen/LVY
altimontà/HVY
amagaforats/IVY
amansau/C
amatori/KVY
ambigen/LVY
amidasa/EVY
amollador/FVY
andorrà/HVY
anfractuós/JVY
angustifoli/KVY
anisofil·le/FVY
annexió/GVY
anoditzi/D
anquilosi/DEVY
antimicrobià/HVY
antimonós/JVY
antimutagen/LVY
antireglamentari/KVY
antitussigen/LVY
antivíric/FVY
aparaulem/C
apol·lini/LVY
apòstrofe/EVY
aragonès/JVY
arbitrari/KVY
arboç/IVY
arcà/HVY
aresblanc/FVY
argentí/GHVY
armeja/D
arpejant/C
arraix/JVY
arruixada/EVY
arximilionari/KVY
assassí/HVY
assibilen/C
assortidor/FVY
astroliqui/D
atabuix/IVY
ateromatós/JVY
attrezzista/EVY
autocitació/GVY
autocròs/IVY
autogen/KVY
autovaccinació/GVY
auxòtrof/FVY
avaren/C
babaganuix/I
bagasser/EF
baix/IJ
baladró/H
balanci/D
bardaix/I
barraloner/F
basidiogen/K
basipodi/E
bassó/G
batallarós/J
beguí/H
benifagí/H
bequegem/C
berrixó/H
bessoner/F
bibliobús/I
biftalat/E
bitini/L
boç/I
bocafí/H
bocafluix/J
bogamarí/G
bombada/E
bomisca/D
bonaerenc/F
boví/H
brevilini/L
brillant/CE
brogent/E
brussel·lès/J
buratí/G
burlaner/F
burofax/I
caciquista/E
calamars/I
calamarsege/D
campetx/I
camús/J
canari/EK
cancel·lació/G
cancerigen/L
candidesa/E
canonegeu/C
canterer/F
capitolí/H
carç/I
carcassa/E
carotè/G
cassís/I
catalanòfob/F
catecumen/L
catgut/E
cavalca/D
cavernós/J
cebuà/H
centellegen/C
ceroferari/K
ciclització/G
cicònid/E
cinamílic/F
circumveí/H
coaptació/G
coccigi/L
coccini/L
colís/BI
col·lagen/L
colonitzador/F
comandant/CF
comendatari/K
comercie/D
commòs/J
comparació/G
comparança/E
concrecionari/K
concurs/I
confutació/G
connectant/C
consanguini/L
contempere/D
continuador/F
contradictori/K
contraplà/G
coral·ligen/L
corberà/H
corcuitós/J
corgeleu/C
cornadís/I
coroneta/E
cosmovisió/G
crioscòpic/F
critiqui/D
cruciferari/K
cuguçós/I
curvilini/L
cutinització/G
decilitre/E
declarin/C
defès/J
deflagrador/F
deïficació/G
dejú/H
denari/EK
deprede/D
desafavorim/C
desapropiació/G
desavanç/I
desbellugue/D
desbrocau/C
desdiguin/C
desdubta/D
desempudeesquin/C
desencarrile/D
desengresquin/C
desensostra/D
desfalden/C
desguaix/I
desideologització/G
desincentive/D
desmaien/C
desmoralitzador/F
desperdigola/D
despitós/J
despolitització/G
despollegar/C
detraieu/C
deture/D
dextrorotatori/K
dialogista/E
difracció/G
difusor/F
digen/L
digin/L
disulfurós/I
diversió/G
domiciliari/K
dominic/F
draguin/C
eguine/D
einsteinià/HVY
eix/IJVY
eixamener/EVY
elastodiè/GVY
electrostàtic/FVY
eleusini/LVY
embetumar/CY
embrinqui/D
emmotlurau/C
empès/JVY
empioqui/D
emproveu/C
encebe/D
encens/IVY
enciamen/C
encunyador/FVY
endodinamogen/KVY
endoreduplicació/GVY
energumen/LVY
enfavar/CY
enfelloneixi/D
engrandiu/C
enigma/EVY
enjonqui/D
enrinxolar/CY
ensorre/D
entotsoleu/C
entrecàs/IVY
entretallador/FVY
enveri/D
enxisau/C
epigin/LVY
eritematós/JVY
escabetx/IVY
escaguitxa/D
escalfant/C
escenificació/GVY
escleròtic/FVY
escolaritat/EVY
escrebantant/C
escuguli/D
escuraplats/IVY
esnariguin/C
espelleta/D
esperançós/JVY
espluguí/HVY
esquinç/IVY
esquivador/FVY
esteatopigi/LVY
estepari/KVY
esteranyini/D
estibnita/EVY
estripant/C
esvarós/JVY
euencèfal/FVY
exacerbació/GVY
exhalatori/KVY
expandisca/D
extraparlamentari/KVY
falsejador/F
falutx/I
fasmòpter/E
federalització/G
feixí/H
fermentós/J
ferrobús/I
filater/F
fitora/DE
flaquejant/C
flix/I
foraviler/F
forcípula/E
formigós/J
fornicari/K
fracció/G
frigi/DL
frigorigen/L
fulmini/DL
fumigen/L
fus/I
gabuli/D
gadità/H
ganós/J
garser/EF
genèric/F
genitori/K
gimnàs/I
gironí/H
glutatió/G
gomiós/J
gosin/C
grifone/D
grilla/DE
gruix/I
heliostàtic/FVY
hematós/JVY
herbolari/KVY
hertzià/HVY
hipoclorós/IVY
hipotermal/EVY
hipoventilació/GY
horticultor/FVY
huitmesó/HVY
il·lusori/KVY
incapaç/IVY
incircumcís/JVY
incline/D
increpatori/KVY
indecisió/GY
indiota/EY
inseminar/CY
insurrecte/FVY
intens/JVY
interbancari/KVY
interpretació/GY
ire/D
isogin/KVY
italià/HVY
jaguar/E
kosovès/J
kuwaitià/H
lactigen/L
laurini/L
legatori/K
ligi/L
lisigen/L
litològic/F
llaç/I
lladracà/G
llauna/DE
llavifès/J
llibertí/H
lluï/D
longilini/L
madràs/I
madurès/J
maganyau/C
malacopterigi/L
malià/H
mamari/K
mandat/E
manganós/J
manter/F
maquetació/G
massalfassí/H
matina/D
matís/I
meritós/J
metacromatisme/E
microelectromecànic/F
mil·lenari/K
mirmidó/G
mitjà/GH
mixtilini/L
monoftonguem/C
moraduix/I
morca/DE
mosquetonege/D
mosterià/H
multicompost/F
multiusuari/K
muniquès/J
mutagen/L
nespró/G
nicenoconstantinopolità/H
ninotaire/E
nodulós/J
notari/K
numantí/H
octaèdric/FVY
ombra/DEVY
ombrós/JVY
operari/KVY
organitzable/EVY
ovació/GVY
palamosí/H
palmarés/I
palpunyem/C
pamfletari/K
panatenaic/F
parcial/E
parençós/J
pedreguerí/H
pegàs/I
pelegrina/DE
perennifoli/K
perequació/G
perigin/L
pèrsic/F
pertinència/E
piadós/J
pitiús/I
pla/GH
planetari/K
platini/D
plutonigen/L
polca/E
poligin/L
polinyaner/F
polititzen/C
pol·linització/G
pollós/J
postbalanç/I
postmeridià/H
precautori/K
primfile/D
professó/G
profitós/J
prolongable/E
proovulatori/K
proteolític/F
quaranta-vuitè/H
quaternari/K
radioenllaç/I
radiopasteurització/G
radiotelefonista/E
raïmós/J
ralentitzeu/C
raona/D
reciclador/F
rectilini/L
reculi/D
reforç/I
reformatació/G
reformatori/K
refrigerem/C
remorós/J
renovellable/E
rés/I
resolutori/K
ressembla/D
retauló/G
reten/C
roglaní/H
romancer/F
ronyós/J
rustiquesa/E
rutinari/K
sacarigen/L
sacrococcigi/L
sanció/G
sangonós/J
sanguí/H
sanguini/L
segmentari/K
seixantè/H
semieix/I
senyador/F
serenata/E
sericigen/L
seriem/C
sevillà/H
siamès/J
silila/D
sobreestimació/G
sospès/I
sotana/E
sotssecretari/K
subaquàtic/F
submarí/H
submís/J
superpurgació/G
supletori/K
suren/C
teclós/J
tel/E
telegoverne/D
teodosià/H
tèrbic/F
terrigen/L
testamentari/K
tiofè/G
titanós/J
tocatabals/I
tornagall/E
torrentí/H
toxigen/L
treballant/C
trenquívol/F
tres/I
tri/H
trombó/G
tubari/K
tuberculós/J
tumescent/E
tussigen/L
utilitari/KVY
vaccí/H
vagassegi/D
vanagloriós/J
venedor/F
ves/CI
vidret/E
vilafamesí/H
vimini/L
vinagrós/J
vinilbenzè/G
vintenari/K
vuitanta-novè/H
xarolau/C
xertolí/H
